Georgia statutes. TITLE 8 Buildings and Housing
Article 5 Housing Trust Fund for the Homeless

Administrative rules and regulations.

Organization and definitions, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, State Housing Trust Fund for the Homeless, Chapter 286-1.

Application and financial assistance, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, State Housing Trust Fund for the Homeless, Chapter 286-2.

8-3-300.
Short title.

This article shall be known and cited as the “State Housing Trust Fund for the Homeless Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

8-3-300

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 717, § 1.

8-3-301.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Commission” means the State Housing Trust Fund for the Homeless Commission created in Code Section 8-3-306.

“Homeless” means persons and families who have no access to or can reasonably be expected not to have access to either traditional or permanent housing which can be considered safe, sanitary, decent, and affordable.

“Low-income persons” means persons or families who lack the income necessary, as determined solely by the commission, to enable them, without financial assistance, to secure safe, sanitary, decent, and affordable housing.

“Member” means a member appointed to serve on the State Housing Trust Fund for the Homeless Commission.

“Qualified sponsor” means a nonprofit, for profit, or governmental sponsor of a residential housing project.

“Residential housing project” means a program designed to enhance residential housing opportunities for low-income persons. Such projects include, but are not limited to, financing in whole or in part the acquisition, rehabilitation, improvement, or construction of residential rental housing and interest rate or down payment assistance programs designed to enhance home ownership opportunities.

“Trust fund” means the State Housing Trust Fund for the Homeless created in Code Section 8-3-302.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-3-301

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 717, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 8; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1653, § 2-1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 872, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1993, “low-income” was substituted for “low income” in paragraph (6).

8-3-302.
Fund created.

The State Housing Trust Fund for the Homeless is created as a separate fund in the state treasury. The fund shall be expended only as provided in this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-3-302

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 717, § 1.

8-3-303.
Amounts credited to trust fund.

The state treasurer shall credit to the trust fund all amounts appropriated or otherwise donated to such trust fund. All funds appropriated to or otherwise paid or credited to the trust fund shall be presumptively concluded to have been committed to the purpose for which they have been appropriated or paid and shall not lapse.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-3-303

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 717, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 3/SB 296.

8-3-304.
Investments.

The state treasurer shall invest trust fund money in the same manner in which state funds are invested as authorized by the State Depository Board pursuant to Article 3 of Chapter 17 of Title 50.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-3-304

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 717, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 3/SB 296.

8-3-305.
Payments from fund.

The Office of the State Treasurer shall be authorized to draw a warrant or warrants upon the trust fund upon receipt of an order for payment of the State Housing Trust Fund for the Homeless Commission, which order for payment has been approved by the Governor.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-3-305

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 717, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 2/SB 296.

8-3-306.
Commission established; members; officers; support personnel; appropriations and budget through Department of Community Affairs.

There is established the State Housing Trust Fund for the Homeless Commission which shall consist of nine members. Two of the nine members shall be the commissioner of community affairs, or his or her designee, and either the chairperson of the Board of Community Affairs or a member of the Board of Community Affairs designated by the chairperson. The Governor shall appoint the remaining seven public members. The public members shall be knowledgeable in the area of housing and, to the extent practicable, shall represent diverse housing concerns. Public members shall serve for a term of four years except that initial appointments shall be staggered as follows: three of the appointees shall serve an initial term of four years and four of the appointees shall serve an initial term of two years. Public members shall continue in office until their successors have been appointed and qualified. In the event of a vacancy in the office of a public member by death, resignation, or otherwise, the Governor shall appoint a successor to serve the balance of the unexpired term. Membership on the commission does not constitute public office, and no member shall be disqualified from holding public office by reason of his or her membership.

The commission shall elect a chairperson who shall serve in that position for a term of two years. The commission shall elect such other officers and appoint committees as it deems appropriate.

The commission shall hire no staff but shall contract with the Department of Community Affairs for professional, technical, and clerical support from the Department of Community Affairs as required. In the event that the Department of Community Affairs is unable to provide the professional, technical, or clerical services required, the commission may hire outside consultants on a specified project basis.

Any and all appropriations made to the trust fund pursuant to the general appropriations Act or the supplemental appropriations Act shall be directed through the Department of Community Affairs. The commission shall submit its budget to and through the Department of Community Affairs.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-3-306

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 717, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1653, § 2-3; Ga. L. 1993, p. 311, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 872, § 2.

8-3-307.
Expense allowance and travel reimbursement for members of commission.

Members of the commission shall serve without compensation but shall receive the same expense allowance per day as that received by a member of the General Assembly for each day such member is in physical attendance at a commission meeting, plus either reimbursement for actual transportation costs while traveling by public carrier or the same mileage allowance for use of a personal car in connection with such attendance as members of the General Assembly receive. Notwithstanding the foregoing, no member shall receive said expense allowance or travel reimbursement if said member is entitled to receive an expense allowance or travel reimbursement or salary for performance of duties on some other state board, commission, or entity, by whatever name called, for work performed on that day in the same location. Expense allowances and travel reimbursement shall be paid from moneys appropriated or otherwise available to the trust fund.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-3-307

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 717, § 1.

8-3-308.
Duties of commission.

The commission shall:

Meet at such times and places as it shall determine necessary or convenient to perform its duties;

Maintain minutes of its meetings;

Adopt rules and regulations for the transaction of its business;

Accept applications for disbursements of available moneys from the trust fund for residential housing projects; and

Maintain or cause to be maintained records of all expenditures of the commission, all funds received, and all disbursements made.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-3-308

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 717, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 8; Ga. L. 1996, p. 872, § 3.

8-3-309.
Acceptance of federal funds; disposition.

The commission may accept federal funds granted by Congress or executive order for the purposes of residential housing projects and gifts, grants, and donations from individuals, private organizations, or foundations. All funds received in this manner shall be transmitted to the state treasurer for deposit in the trust fund to be disbursed as other moneys in the trust fund.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-3-309

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 717, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 3/SB 296.

8-3-310.
Authorized disbursement.

The commission may authorize the disbursement of available money from the trust fund for residential housing projects sponsored by a qualified sponsor. The commission may consult, as appropriate, with persons with varied and diverse interests in housing in order to acquaint them with the trust fund and to solicit information relating to housing needs, residential housing projects, and criteria for selection of residential housing projects. The criteria for making such disbursement decisions shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

The number of persons assisted;

The leveraging of money or in-kind services by a qualified sponsor;

The geographic distribution of residential housing projects;

The availability of other forms of assistance; and

Any and all other factors bearing upon the advisability and necessity of the residential housing project.

Funds may also be disbursed from the trust fund to pay expenses of the commission, to pay any and all operating expenses, and to pay for professional, technical, and clerical services provided the commission by the Department of Community Affairs or by other outside sources.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-3-310

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 717, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1653, § 2-3; Ga. L. 1996, p. 872, § 4.

8-3-311.
Powers of commission to hold title, foreclose, commence action to protect or enforce rights, and exercise other rights for its benefit or protection.

The commission shall have the power to hold title to any residential housing project financed by it, but it shall not be required to do so.

The commission shall have the power to foreclose on any mortgage or security interest in default and to commence any action to protect or enforce any right conferred upon it by any law, mortgage, security agreement, deed of trust, deed to secure debt, contract, or other agreement; to bid for and purchase property which was the subject of such mortgage or security interest at any foreclosure or at any other sale; to accept a deed in lieu of foreclosure; to acquire or take possession of such property; and to exercise any and all rights as provided by law or contract for the benefit or protection of the commission.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-3-311

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 311, § 2.